North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 10. Depositions.

§§ 8-71 through 8-73.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 954, s. 4.

§ 8-74.
Depositions for defendant in criminal actions.

In all criminal actions, hearings and investigations it shall be lawful for the defendant in any such action to make affidavit before the clerk of the superior court of the county in which said action is pending, that it is important for the defense that he have the testimony of any person, whose name must be given, and that such person is so infirm, or otherwise physically incapacitated, or nonresident of this State, that he cannot procure his attendance at the trial or hearing of said cause. Upon the filing of such affidavit, it shall be the duty of the clerk to appoint some responsible person to take the deposition of such witness, which deposition may be read in the trial of such criminal action under the same rules as now apply by law to depositions in civil actions: provided, that the district attorney or prosecuting attorney of the district, county or town in which such action is pending have 10 days’ notice of the taking of such deposition, who may appear in person or by representative to conduct the cross-examination of such witness.

History.

Code, s. 1357; 1891, c. 522; 1893, c. 80; Rev., s. 1652; 1915, c. 251; C.S., s. 1812; 1971, c. 381, s. 6; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to attendance of witnesses in criminal proceedings, see

G.S. 15A-801

et seq.

As to discovery in criminal proceedings, see

G.S. 15A-901

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For article discussing constitutional considerations with respect to criminal discovery for the defense and prosecution, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 437 (1972).

§ 8-75.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 381, s. 13.

§ 8-76.
Depositions before municipal authorities.

Any board of aldermen, board of town or county commissioners or any person interested in any proceeding, investigation, hearing or trial before such board, may take the depositions of all persons whose evidence may be desired for use in said proceeding, investigation, hearing or trial; and to do so, the chairman of such board or such person may apply in person or by attorney to the superior court clerk of that county in which such proceeding, investigation, hearing or trial is pending, for a commission to take the same, and said clerk, upon such application, shall issue such commission, or such deposition may be taken by a notary public of this State or of any other state or foreign country without a commission issuing from the court; and the notice and proceedings upon the taking of said depositions shall be the same as provided for in civil actions; and if the person upon whom the notice of the taking of such deposition is to be served is absent from or cannot after due diligence be found within this State, but can be found within the county in which the deposition is to be taken, then, and in that case, said notice shall be personally served on such person by the commissioner appointed to take such deposition or by the notary taking such deposition, as the case may be; and when any such deposition is returned to the clerk it shall be opened and passed upon by him and delivered to such board, and the reading and using of such deposition shall conform to the rules of the superior court.

History.

1889, c. 151; Rev., s. 1653; C.S., s. 1814; 1943, c. 543.

§ 8-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 379, s. 9.

§ 8-78.
Commissioner may subpoena witness and punish for contempt.

Commissioners to take depositions appointed by the courts of this State, or by the courts of the states or territories of the United States, arbitrators, referees, and all persons acting under a commission issuing from any court of record in this State, are hereby empowered, they or the clerks of the courts respectively in this State, to which such commission shall be returnable, to issue subpoenas, specifying the time and place for the attendance of witnesses before them, and to administer oaths to said witnesses, to the end that they may give their testimony. And any witness appearing before any of the said persons and refusing to give his testimony on oath touching such matters as he may be lawfully examined unto shall be committed, by warrant of the person before whom he shall so refuse, to the common jail of the county, there to remain until he may be willing to give his evidence; which warrant of commitment shall recite what authority the person has to take the testimony of such witness, and the refusal of the witness to give it.

History.

1777, c. 115, s. 42, P.R; 1805, c. 685, ss. 1, 2, P.R; 1848, c. 66; 1850, c. 188; R.C., c. 31, s. 64; Code, s. 1362; Rev., s. 1649; C.S., s. 1816.

Cross References.

As to willful refusal to be sworn or to testify amounting to criminal contempt, see G.S. 5A-11(4).

§ 8-79.
Attendance before commissioner enforced.

The sheriff of the county where the witness may be shall execute all such subpoenas, and make due return thereof before the commissioner, or other person, before whom the witness is to appear, in the same manner, and under the same penalties, as in case of process of a like kind returnable to court; and when the witness shall be subpoenaed five days before the time of his required attendance, and shall fail to appear according to the subpoena and give evidence, the default shall be noted by the commissioner, arbitrator, or other person aforesaid; and in case the default be made before a commissioner acting under authority from courts without the State, the defaulting witness shall forfeit and pay to the party at whose instance he may be subpoenaed fifty dollars, and on the trial for such penalty the subpoena issued by the commissioner, or other person, as aforesaid, with the indorsement thereon of due service by the officer serving the same, together with the default noted as aforesaid and indorsed on the subpoena, shall be prima facie evidence of the forfeiture, and sufficient to entitle the plaintiff to judgment for the same, unless the witness may show his incapacity to have attended.

History.

1848, c. 66, s. 2; 1850, c. 188, ss. 1, 2; R.C., c. 31, s. 65; Code, s. 1363; Rev., s. 1650; C.S., s. 1817.

§ 8-80.
Remedies against defaulting witness before commissioner.

But in case the default be made before a commissioner, arbitrator, referee or other person, acting under a commission or authority from any of the courts of this State, then the same shall be certified under his hand, and returned with the subpoena to the court by which he was commissioned or empowered to take the evidence of such witness; and thereupon the court shall adjudge the defaulting witness to pay to the party at whose instance he was summoned the sum of forty dollars ($40.00); but execution shall not issue therefor until the same be ordered by the court, after such proceedings had as shall give said witness an opportunity to show cause, if he can, against the issuing thereof.

History.

1850, c. 188, s. 2; R.C., c. 31, s. 66; Code, s. 1364; Rev., s. 1651; C.S., s. 1818.

§ 8-81.
Objection to deposition before trial.

At any time before the trial, or hearing of an action or proceeding, any party may make a motion to the judge or court to reject a deposition for irregularity in the taking of it, either in whole or in part, for scandal, impertinence, the incompetency of the testimony, for insufficient notice, or for any other good cause. The objecting party shall state his exceptions in writing.

History.

1869-70, c. 227, ss. 13, 17; Code, s. 1361; 1895, c. 312; 1903, c. 132; Rev., s. 1648; C.S., s. 1819.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The 1980 Amendments to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and Proposals for North Carolina Practice,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 915 (1980).

§ 8-82.
Deposition not quashed after trial begun.

No deposition shall be quashed, or rejected, on objection first made after a trial has begun, merely because of an irregularity in taking the same, provided it shall appear that the party objecting had notice that it had been taken, and it was on file long enough before the trial to enable him to present his objection.

History.

1869-70, c. 227, s. 12; Code, s. 1360; Rev., s. 1647; C.S., s. 1820.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The 1980 Amendments to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and Proposals for North Carolina Practice,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 915 (1980).

§ 8-83.
When deposition may be read on the trial.

Every deposition taken and returned in the manner provided by law may be read on the trial of the action or proceeding, or before any referee, in the following cases, and not otherwise:

If the witness is dead, or has become insane since the deposition was taken.

If the witness is a resident of a foreign country, or of another state, and is not present at the trial.

If the witness is confined in a prison outside the county in which the trial takes place.

If the witness is so old, sick or infirm as to be unable to attend court.

If the witness is the President of the United States, or the head of any department of the federal government, or a judge, district attorney, or clerk of any court of the United States, and the trial shall take place during the term of such court.

If the witness is the Governor of the State, or the head of any department of the State government, or the president of the University, or the head of any other incorporated college in the State, or the superintendent or any physician in the employ of any of the hospitals for the insane for the State.

If the witness is a justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, or a judge, presiding officer, clerk or district attorney of any court of record, and the trial shall take place during the term of such court.

If the witness is a member of the Congress of the United States, or a member of the General Assembly, and the trial shall take place during a time that such member is in the service of that body.

Except in actions or proceedings governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure, if the witness has been duly summoned, and at the time of the trial is out of the State, or is more than seventy-five miles by the usual public mode of travel from the place where the court is sitting, without the procurement or consent of the party offering his deposition.

If the action is pending in a magistrate’s court the deposition may be read on the trial of the action, provided the witness is more than 75 miles by the usual public mode of travel from the place where the court is sitting.

Except in actions or proceedings governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure, if the witness is a physician duly licensed to practice medicine in the State of North Carolina, and resides or maintains his office outside the county in which the action is pending.

If any provision of this section conflicts with the Rules of Civil Procedure, then those Rules shall control in actions or proceedings governed by them.

History.

1777, c. 115, ss. 39, 40, 41, P.R; 1803, c. 633, P.R; 1828, ch. 24, ss. 1, 2; 1836, c. 30; R.C., c. 31, s. 63; 1869-70, c. 227, s. 11; 1881, c. 279, ss. 1, 3; Code, s. 1358; 1905, c. 366; Rev., s. 1645; 1919, c. 324; C.S., s. 1821; 1965, c. 675; 1969, c. 44, s. 23; 1971, c. 381, s. 7; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1991, c. 491, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to depositions in criminal actions, see

G.S. 8-74

and note thereto.

As to manner, form, and time of taking exceptions, see

G.S. 8-81

, 8-82 and notes thereto.

For the Rules of Civil Procedure, see

G.S. 1A-1

.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The 1980 Amendments to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and Proposals for North Carolina Practice,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 915 (1980).

For article, “Taking a Deposition Under North Carolina Law,” see 21 N.C. Cent. L.J. 215 (1995).

§ 8-84.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 762, s. 4.